Washington statutes.
RCW 10.10.010

Court rules.

Every person convicted before a district judge of any offense may appeal from the judgment as provided by court rules.

[ 1987 c 202 s 156; 1891 c 29 s 6, part; RRS s 1919, part. Prior: Code 1881 s 1898, part; 1877 p 203 s 7, part; 1873 p 384 s 196, part; 1854 p 261 s 177. Formerly RCW 10.10.010, 10.10.020, and 10.10.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.